Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3306
Effect of communication on privileges.

No communication
between the attorney and the civil litigation funding company as it pertains
to the nonrecourse civil litigation funding contract shall limit, waive, or
abrogate the scope or nature of any statutory or common-law privilege, including
the work-product doctrine and the attorney-client privilege.

Laws 2010, LB1094, § 6.